District of Columbia statutes.
31-3911

Repealed

Investments.

Repealed.

Oct. 21, 2000, D.C. Law 13-192, § 12, 47 DCR 7320
April 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-297, § 401(d), 50 DCR 330
Mar. 17, 2005, D.C. Law 15-262, § 24(a), 52 DCR 1205
D.C. Law 14-297, in subsec. (a), substituted “Chapter 13A of this title” for “§ 31-2502.18”.
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section and transition provisions, see § 24 of Captive Insurance Company Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-640, November 30, 2004, 52 DCR 1238).